Oklahoma, session 2026, SB569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 567.4c of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. An Advanced Practice Registered Nurse recognized by the


Oklahoma Board of Nursing as a Certified Nurse Practitioner,


Clinical Nurse Specialist, or Certified Nurse-Midwife who has


completed a minimum of three (3) years of practice with prescriptive


authority supervised by a physician may apply to the Oklahoma Board


of Nursing for authority to prescribe and order independent of


supervision.


2. The application for independent prescriptive authority shall


include proof that the Certified Nurse Practitioner, Clinical Nurse


Specialist, or Certified Nurse-Midwife:


a. holds a valid, current license in the appropriate


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse role issued by the


Board and is in good standing with the Board, and

Req. No. 87 Page 2


b. has completed a minimum of three (3) years of practice


with prescriptive authority supervised by a physician.


3. Independent prescriptive authority granted under this


subsection shall be valid until the expiration of the current


license to practice and may be renewed upon application to the Board


at the same time and for the same period as the renewal of the


license to practice.


B. The Board shall review any application submitted under this


section and shall approve or deny the application, stating the


reason or reasons for denial, if denied. If denied, the applicant


may reapply using the process prescribed by subsection A of this


section.


C. The Board may suspend or revoke independent prescriptive


authority granted under this section for good cause at any time.


D. The Board may establish a fee for the review of initial and


renewal applications under the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 567.5b of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. An Advanced Practice Registered Nurse, or the employer of


the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse on his or her behalf, shall


carry malpractice insurance or demonstrate proof of financial


responsibility in a minimum amount of One Million Dollars



Req. No. 87 Page 3


($1,000,000.00) per occurrence and Three Million Dollars


($3,000,000.00) in the aggregate per year.


B. An Advanced Practice Registered Nurse who is employed by or


under contract with a federal agency that carries malpractice


insurance in any amount on behalf of the Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse shall be deemed in compliance with subsection A of


this section when practicing under such federal employment or


contract. However, to the extent the Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse practices outside of such federal employment or contract, the


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse, or his or her employer, shall


comply with subsection A of this section.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 567.5c of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Board of Nursing shall promulgate rules


governing advertising of health care services by Advanced Practice


Registered Nurses to include, but not be limited to, the specialty


areas or types of health care services Advanced Practice Registered


Nurses may advertise based on their training or experience.


B. Nothing in this act shall be construed to allow an Advanced


Practice Registered Nurse to perform any medical service or


prescribe any medication beyond those authorized under state law or


in a manner otherwise inconsistent with state law.



Req. No. 87 Page 4


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 479 of Title 59, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision and the


State Board of Osteopathic Examiners shall make available, and keep


updated, in a conspicuous location on the website of each Board a


list of physicians who are available to supervise Advanced Practice


Registered Nurses. The Boards shall develop procedures necessary


for the implementation of this section.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 353.1, as


amended by Section 6, Chapter 288, O.S.L. 2022 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 353.1), is amended to read as follows:


Section 353.1. For the purposes of the Oklahoma Pharmacy Act:


1. “Accredited program” means those seminars, classes,


meetings, work projects, and other educational courses approved by


the Board State Board of Pharmacy for purposes of continuing


professional education;


2. “Act” means the Oklahoma Pharmacy Act;


3. “Administer” means the direct application of a drug, whether


by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body


of a patient;


4. “Assistant pharmacist” means any person presently licensed


as an assistant pharmacist in the State of Oklahoma this state by


the Board pursuant to Section 353.10 of this title and for the

Req. No. 87 Page 5


purposes of the Oklahoma Pharmacy Act shall be considered the same


as a pharmacist, except where otherwise specified;


5. “Board” or “State Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy;


6. “Certify” or “certification of a prescription” means the


review of a filled prescription by a licensed pharmacist or a


licensed practitioner with dispensing authority to confirm that the


medication, labeling, and packaging of the filled prescription are


accurate and meet all requirements prescribed by state and federal


law. For the purposes of this paragraph, “licensed practitioner”


shall not include optometrists with dispensing authority;


7. “Chemical” means any medicinal substance, whether simple or


compound or obtained through the process of the science and art of


chemistry, whether of organic or inorganic origin;


8. “Compounding” means the combining, admixing, mixing,


diluting, pooling, reconstituting, or otherwise altering of a drug


or bulk drug substance to create a drug. Compounding includes the


preparation of drugs or devices in anticipation of prescription drug


orders based on routine, regularly observed prescribing patterns;


9. “Continuing professional education” means professional,


pharmaceutical education in the general areas of the socioeconomic


and legal aspects of health care; the properties and actions of


drugs and dosage forms; and the etiology, characteristics, and


therapeutics of the diseased state;



Req. No. 87 Page 6


10. “Dangerous drug”, “legend drug”, “prescription drug”, or


“Rx Only” means a drug:


a. for human use subject to 21 U.S.C., Section 353(b)(1),


or


b. is labeled “Prescription Only”, or labeled with the


following statement: “Caution: Federal law restricts


this drug except for to use by or on the order of a


licensed veterinarian.”;


11. “Director” means the Executive Director of the State Board


of Pharmacy unless context clearly indicates otherwise;


12. “Dispense” or “dispensing” means the interpretation,


evaluation, and implementation of a prescription drug order


including the preparation and delivery of a drug or device to a


patient or a patient’s agent in a suitable container appropriately


labeled for subsequent administration to, or use by, a patient.


Dispense includes sell, distribute, leave with, give away, dispose


of, deliver, or supply;


13. “Dispenser” means a retail pharmacy, hospital pharmacy, a


group of chain pharmacies under common ownership and control that do


not act as a wholesale distributor, or any other person authorized


by law to dispense or administer prescription drugs, and the


affiliated warehouses or distributions of such entities under common


ownership and control that do not act as a wholesale distributor.


For the purposes of this paragraph, “dispenser” dispenser does not

Req. No. 87 Page 7


mean a person who dispenses only products to be used in animals in


accordance with 21 U.S.C., Section 360b(a)(5);


14. “Distribute” or “distribution” means the sale, purchase,


trade, delivery, handling, storage, or receipt of a product, and


does not include the dispensing of a product pursuant to a


prescription executed in accordance with 21 U.S.C., Section


353(b)(1) or the dispensing of a product approved under 21 U.S.C.,


Section 360b(b); provided, taking actual physical possession of a


product or title shall not be required;


15. “Doctor of Pharmacy” means a person licensed by the Board


to engage in the practice of pharmacy. The terms “pharmacist”,


“D.Ph.”, and “Doctor of Pharmacy” shall be interchangeable and shall


have the same meaning wherever they appear in the Oklahoma Statutes


and the rules promulgated by the Board;


16. “Drug outlet” means all manufacturers, repackagers,


outsourcing facilities, wholesale distributors, third-party


logistics providers, pharmacies, and all other facilities which are


engaged in dispensing, delivery, distribution, or storage of


dangerous drugs;


17. “Drugs” means all medicinal substances and preparations


recognized by the United States Pharmacopoeia Pharmacopeia and


National Formulary, or any revision thereof, and all substances and


preparations intended for external and/or internal use in the cure,


diagnosis, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans

Req. No. 87 Page 8


or animals and all substances and preparations, other than food,


intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of a


human or animals;


18. “Drug sample” means a unit of a prescription drug packaged


under the authority and responsibility of the manufacturer that is


not intended to be sold and is intended to promote the sale of the


drug;


19. “Durable medical equipment” has the same meaning as


provided by Section 2 of this act Section 375.2 of this title;


20. “Filled prescription” means a packaged prescription


medication to which a label has been affixed which contains such


information as is required by the Oklahoma Pharmacy Act;


21. “Hospital” means any institution licensed as a hospital by


this state for the care and treatment of patients, or a pharmacy


operated by the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs;


22. “Licensed practitioner” means:


a. an allopathic physician,


b. an osteopathic physician,


c. a podiatric physician,


d. a dentist,


e. a veterinarian or,


f. an optometrist, or


g. an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse,



Req. No. 87 Page 9


licensed to practice and authorized to prescribe dangerous drugs


within the scope of practice of such practitioner;


23. “Manufacturer” or “virtual manufacturer” means with respect


to a product:


a. a person that holds an application approved under 21


U.S.C., Section 355 or a license issued under 42


U.S.C., Section 262 for such product, or if such


product is not the subject of an approved application


or license, the person who manufactured the product,


b. a co-licensed partner of the person described in


subparagraph a of this paragraph that obtains the


product directly from a person described in this


subparagraph or subparagraph a of this paragraph,


c. an affiliate of a person described in subparagraph a


or b of this paragraph who receives the product


directly from a person described in this subparagraph


or in subparagraph a or b of this paragraph, or


d. a person who contracts with another to manufacture a


product;


24. “Manufacturing” means the production, preparation,


propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a device or a


drug, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of


natural origin or independently by means of chemical or biological


synthesis and includes any packaging or repackaging of the

Req. No. 87 Page 10


substances or labeling or relabeling of its container, and the


promotion and marketing of such drugs or devices. The term


“manufacturing” manufacturing also includes the preparation and


promotion of commercially available products from bulk compounds for


resale by licensed pharmacies, licensed practitioners, or other


persons;


25. “Medical gas” means those gases including those in liquid


state upon which the manufacturer or distributor has placed one of


several cautions, such as “Rx Only”, in compliance with federal law;


26. “Medical gas order” means an order for medical gas issued


by a licensed prescriber;


27. “Medical gas distributor” means a person licensed to


distribute, transfer, wholesale, deliver, or sell medical gases on


drug orders to suppliers or other entities licensed to use,


administer, or distribute medical gas and may also include a patient


or ultimate user;


28. “Medical gas supplier” means a person who dispenses medical


gases on drug orders only to a patient or ultimate user;


29. “Medicine” means any drug or combination of drugs which has


the property of curing, preventing, treating, diagnosing, or


mitigating diseases, or which is used for that purpose;


30. “Nonprescription drugs” means medicines or drugs which are


sold without a prescription and which are prepackaged for use by the


consumer and labeled in accordance with the requirements of the

Req. No. 87 Page 11


statutes and regulations of this state and the federal government.


Such items shall also include medical and dental supplies and


bottled or nonbulk chemicals which are sold or offered for sale to


the general public if such articles or preparations meet the


requirements of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21


U.S.C.A., Section 321 et seq.;


31. “Outsourcing facility” including “virtual outsourcing


facility” means a facility at one geographic location or address


that:


a. is engaged in the compounding of sterile drugs,


b. has elected to register as an outsourcing facility,


and


c. complies with all requirements of 21 U.S.C., Section


353b;


32. “Package” means the smallest individual saleable unit of


product for distribution by a manufacturer or repackager that is


intended by the manufacturer for ultimate sale to the dispenser of


such product. For the purposes of this paragraph, “individual


saleable unit” means the smallest container of a product introduced


into commerce by the manufacturer or repackager that is intended by


the manufacturer or repackager for individual sale to a dispenser;


33. “Person” means an individual, partnership, limited


liability company, corporation, or association, unless the context


otherwise requires;

Req. No. 87 Page 12


34. “Pharmacist-in-charge” or “PIC” means the pharmacist


licensed in this state responsible for the management control of a


pharmacy and all other aspects of the practice of pharmacy in a


licensed pharmacy as defined provided by Section 353.18 of this


title;


35. “Pharmacy” means a place regularly licensed by the State


Board of Pharmacy in which prescriptions, drugs, medicines,


chemicals, and poisons are compounded or dispensed or such place


where pharmacists practice the profession of pharmacy, or a pharmacy


operated by the Oklahoma Department of Veterans Affairs;


36. “Pharmacy technician”, “technician”, “Rx tech”, or “tech”


means a person issued a Technician technician permit by the State


Board of Pharmacy to assist the pharmacist and perform


nonjudgmental, technical, manipulative, non-discretionary functions


in the prescription department under the immediate and direct


supervision of a pharmacist;


37. “Poison” means any substance which when introduced into the


body, either directly or by absorption, produces violent, morbid, or


fatal changes, or which destroys living tissue with which such


substance comes into contact;


38. “Practice of pharmacy” means:


a. the interpretation and evaluation of prescription


orders,



Req. No. 87 Page 13


b. the compounding, dispensing, administering, and


labeling of drugs and devices, except labeling by a


manufacturer, repackager, or distributor of


nonprescription drugs and commercially packaged legend


drugs and devices,


c. the participation in drug selection and drug


utilization reviews,


d. the proper and safe storage of drugs and devices and


the maintenance of proper records thereof,


e. the responsibility for advising by counseling and


providing information, where professionally necessary


or where regulated, of therapeutic values, content,


hazards, and use of drugs and devices,


f. the offering or performing of those acts, services,


operations, or transactions necessary in the conduct,


operation, management, and control of a pharmacy, or


g. the provision of those acts or services that are


necessary to provide pharmaceutical care;


39. “Preparation” means an article which may or may not contain


sterile products compounded in a licensed pharmacy pursuant to the


order of a licensed prescriber;


40. “Prescriber” means a person licensed in this state who is


authorized to prescribe dangerous drugs within the scope of practice


of the person’s profession;

Req. No. 87 Page 14


41. “Prescription” means and includes any order for drug or


medical supplies written or signed, or transmitted by word of mouth,


telephone, or other means of communication:


a. by a licensed prescriber,


b. under the supervision of an Oklahoma licensed


practitioner, an Oklahoma licensed advanced practice


registered nurse or an Oklahoma licensed by a


physician assistant pursuant to a practice agreement,


or


c. (1) under the supervision of a supervising physician,


by a Certified Nurse Practitioner, Clinical Nurse


Specialist, or Certified Nurse-Midwife licensed


in this state who has not obtained independent


prescriptive authority under Section 1 of this


act, or


(2) by a Certified Nurse Practitioner, Clinical Nurse


Specialist, or Certified Nurse-Midwife licensed


in this state who has obtained independent


prescriptive authority under Section 1 of this


act, or


d. by an Oklahoma licensed wholesaler or distributor as


authorized in Section 353.29.1 of this title;


42. “Product” means a prescription drug in a finished dosage


form for administration to a patient without substantial further

Req. No. 87 Page 15


manufacturing, such as capsules, tablets, and lyophilized products


before reconstitution. “Product” Product does not include blood


components intended for transfusion, radioactive drugs or biologics


and medical gas;


43. “Repackager”, including “virtual repackager”, means a


person who owns or operates an establishment that repacks and


relabels a product or package for further sale or distribution


without further transaction;


44. “Sterile drug” means a drug that is intended for parenteral


administration, an ophthalmic or oral inhalation drug in aqueous


format, or a drug that is required to be sterile under state and


federal law;


45. “Supervising physician” means an individual holding a


current license to practice as a physician from the State Board of


Medical Licensure and Supervision, pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Allopathic Medical and Surgical Licensure and Supervision


Act, or the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act, who supervises


an advanced practice registered nurse a Certified Nurse


Practitioner, Clinical Nurse Specialist, or Certified Nurse-Midwife


as defined in Section 567.3a of this title who has not obtained


independent prescriptive authority under Section 1 of this act,


and who is not in training as an intern, resident, or fellow. To be


eligible to supervise an advanced practice registered nurse, such

Req. No. 87 Page 16


The supervising physician shall remain in compliance with the rules


promulgated by the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision


or the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners;


46. “Supportive personnel” means technicians and auxiliary


supportive persons who are regularly paid employees of a pharmacy


who work and perform tasks in the pharmacy as authorized by Section


353.18A of this title;


47. “Third-party logistics provider” including “virtual third-


party logistics provider” means an entity that provides or


coordinates warehousing, or other logistics services of a product in


interstate commerce on behalf of a manufacturer, wholesale


distributor, or dispenser of a product but does not take ownership


of the product, nor have responsibility to direct the sale or


disposition of the product. For the purposes of this paragraph,


“third-party logistics provider” third-party logistics provider does


not include shippers and the United States Postal Service;


48. “Wholesale distributor” including “virtual wholesale


distributor” means a person other than a manufacturer, a


manufacturer’s co-licensed partner, a third-party logistics


provider, or repackager engaged in wholesale distribution as defined


by 21 U.S.C., Section 353(e)(4) as amended by the Drug Supply Chain


Security Act;


49. “County jail” means a facility operated by a county for the


physical detention and correction of persons charged with, or

Req. No. 87 Page 17


convicted of, criminal offenses or ordinance violations or persons


found guilty of civil or criminal contempt;


50. “State correctional facility” means a facility or


institution that houses a prisoner population under the jurisdiction


of the Department of Corrections;


51. “Unit dose package” means a package that contains a single


dose drug with the name, strength, control number, and expiration


date of that drug on the label; and


52. “Unit of issue package” means a package that provides


multiple doses of the same drug, but each drug is individually


separated and includes the name, lot number, and expiration date.


SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 353.1a, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 353.1a. A. Prescribing 1. Prescriptive authority


shall be allowed, under the medical direction of a current


supervision agreement with a supervising physician, for an advanced


practice nurse a licensed Advanced Practice Registered Nurse


recognized by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing in one of the following


categories: advanced registered nurse practitioners, clinical nurse


specialists, or certified nurse-midwives as a Certified Nurse


Practitioner, Clinical Nurse Specialist, or Certified Nurse-Midwife


who has not obtained independent prescriptive authority under


Section 1 of this act.



Req. No. 87 Page 18


2. Prescriptive authority shall be allowed, independent of a


current supervision agreement with a supervising physician, for a


licensed Advanced Practice Registered Nurse recognized by the


Oklahoma Board of Nursing as a Certified Nurse Practitioner,


Clinical Nurse Specialist, or Certified Nurse-Midwife who has


obtained independent prescriptive authority under Section 1 of this


act.


B. The advanced practice nurse Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse may write or sign, or transmit by word of mouth, telephone, or


other means of communication an order for drugs or medical supplies


that is intended to be filled, compounded, or dispensed by a


pharmacist. The supervising physician, if applicable, and the


advanced practice nurse prescribing Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse shall be identified at the time of origination of the


prescription and the name of the advanced practice nurse prescribing


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse shall be printed on the


prescription label.


B. C. Pharmacists may dispense prescriptions for non-controlled


prescription drugs authorized by an advanced practice nurse Advanced


Practice Registered Nurse or physician assistant, not located in


Oklahoma this state, provided that they are licensed in the state in


which they are actively prescribing.


C. D. 1. Pharmacists may only dispense prescriptions for


controlled dangerous substances prescribed by an advanced practice

Req. No. 87 Page 19


nurse or physician assistant Advanced Practice Registered Nurse


licensed in the State of Oklahoma and supervised by an Oklahoma-


licensed practitioner this state who meets the criteria in paragraph


or 2 of subsection A of this section.


2. Pharmacists may only dispense prescriptions for controlled


dangerous substances prescribed by a physician assistant licensed in


this state pursuant to a practice agreement.


SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 567.3a, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 567.3a. As used in the Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act:


1. “Board” means the Oklahoma Board of Nursing;


2. “The practice of nursing” means the performance of services


provided for purposes of nursing diagnosis and treatment of human


responses to actual or potential health problems consistent with


educational preparation. Knowledge and skill are the basis for


assessment, analysis, planning, intervention, and evaluation used in


the promotion and maintenance of health and nursing management of


illness, injury, infirmity, restoration or of optimal function, or


death with dignity. Practice is based on understanding the human


condition across the human lifespan and understanding the


relationship of the individual within the environment. This


practice includes execution of the medical regime including the


administration of medications and treatments prescribed by any


person authorized by state law to so prescribe;

Req. No. 87 Page 20


3. “Registered nursing” means the practice of the full scope of


nursing which includes, but is not limited to:


a. assessing the health status of individuals, families,


and groups,


b. analyzing assessment data to determine nursing care


needs,


c. establishing goals to meet identified health care


needs,


d. planning a strategy of care,


e. establishing priorities of nursing intervention to


implement the strategy of care,


f. implementing the strategy of care,


g. delegating such tasks as may safely be performed by


others, consistent with educational preparation and


that do not conflict with the provisions of the


Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act,


h. providing safe and effective nursing care rendered


directly or indirectly,


i. evaluating responses to interventions,


j. teaching the principles and practice of nursing,


k. managing and supervising the practice of nursing,


l. collaborating with other health professionals in the


management of health care,



Req. No. 87 Page 21


m. performing additional nursing functions in accordance


with knowledge and skills acquired beyond basic


nursing preparation, and


n. delegating those nursing tasks as defined in the rules


of the Board that may be performed by an advanced


unlicensed assistive person Advanced Unlicensed


Assistant;


4. “Licensed practical nursing” means the practice of nursing


under the supervision or direction of a registered nurse Registered


Nurse, licensed physician, or dentist. This directed scope of


nursing practice includes, but is not limited to:


a. contributing to the assessment of the health status of


individuals and groups,


b. participating in the development and modification of


the plan of care,


c. implementing the appropriate aspects of the plan of


care,


d. delegating such tasks as may safely be performed by


others, consistent with educational preparation and


that do not conflict with the Oklahoma Nursing


Practice Act,


e. providing safe and effective nursing care rendered


directly or indirectly,



Req. No. 87 Page 22


f. participating in the evaluation of responses to


interventions,


g. teaching basic nursing skills and related principles,


h. performing additional nursing procedures in accordance


with knowledge and skills acquired through education


beyond nursing preparation, and


i. delegating those nursing tasks as defined in the rules


of the Board that may be performed by an advanced


unlicensed assistive person Advanced Unlicensed


Assistant;


5. “Advanced Practice Registered Nurse” means a licensed


Registered Nurse:


a. who has completed an advanced practice registered


nursing education program in preparation for one of


four recognized advanced practice registered nurse


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse roles,


b. who has passed a national certification examination


recognized by the Board that measures the advanced


practice registered nurse Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse role and specialty competencies and who


maintains recertification in the role and specialty


through a national certification program,


c. who has acquired advanced clinical knowledge and


skills in preparation for providing both direct and

Req. No. 87 Page 23


indirect care to patients; however, the defining


factor for all Advanced Practice Registered Nurses is


that a significant component of the education and


practice focuses on direct care of individuals,


d. whose practice builds on the competencies of


Registered Nurses by demonstrating a greater depth and


breadth of knowledge, a greater synthesis of data, and


increased complexity of skills and interventions, and


e. who has obtained a license as an Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse in one of the following roles:


Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist, Certified


Nurse-Midwife, Clinical Nurse Specialist, or Certified


Nurse Practitioner.


Only those persons who hold a license to practice advanced


practice registered nursing in this state shall have the right to


use the title “Advanced Practice Registered Nurse” Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse and to use the abbreviation “APRN”. Only those


persons who have obtained a license in the following disciplines


shall have the right to fulfill the roles and use the applicable


titles: Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist and the abbreviation


“CRNA”, Certified Nurse-Midwife and the abbreviation “CNM”, Clinical


Nurse Specialist and the abbreviation “CNS”, and Certified Nurse


Practitioner and the abbreviation “CNP”.



Req. No. 87 Page 24


It shall be unlawful for any person to assume the role or use


the title Advanced Practice Registered Nurse or use the abbreviation


“APRN” APRN or use the respective specialty role titles and


abbreviations or to use any other titles or abbreviations that would


reasonably lead a person to believe the user is an Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse, unless permitted by the Oklahoma Nursing Practice


Act. Any individual doing so shall be guilty of a misdemeanor,


which shall be punishable, upon conviction, by imprisonment in the


county jail for not more than one (1) year or by a fine of not less


than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine for each


offense;


6. “Certified Nurse Practitioner” is means an Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse who performs in an expanded role in the delivery of


health care:


a. consistent with advanced educational preparation as a


Certified Nurse Practitioner in an area of specialty,


b. functions within the Certified Nurse Practitioner


scope of practice for the selected area of


specialization, and


c. is in accord with the standards for Certified Nurse


Practitioners as identified by the certifying body and


approved by the Board.



Req. No. 87 Page 25


A Certified Nurse Practitioner shall be eligible, in accordance


with the scope of practice of the Certified Nurse Practitioner, to


obtain recognition as authorized by the Board to prescribe, as


defined by the rules promulgated by the Board pursuant to this


section and subject to the medical direction of a supervising


physician Section 567.4a of this title and Section 1 of this act.


This authorization shall not include dispensing drugs, but shall not


preclude, subject to federal regulations, the receipt of, the


signing for, or the dispensing of professional samples to patients.


The Certified Nurse Practitioner accepts responsibility,


accountability, and obligation to practice in accordance with usual


and customary advanced practice registered nursing standards and


functions as defined by the scope of practice/role definition


statements for the Certified Nurse Practitioner;


7. a. “Clinical Nurse Specialist” is means an Advanced


Practice Registered Nurse who holds:


(1) a master’s degree or higher in nursing with


clinical specialization preparation to function


in an expanded role,


(2) specialty certification from a national


certifying organization recognized by the Board,


and


(3) an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse license


from the Board, and.

Req. No. 87 Page 26


(4) any


Any nurse holding a specialty certification as a


Clinical Nurse Specialist valid on January 1, 1994,


granted by a national certifying organization


recognized by the Board, shall be deemed to be a


Clinical Nurse Specialist under the provisions of the


Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act.


b. In the expanded role, the Clinical Nurse Specialist


performs at an advanced practice level which shall


include, but not be limited to:


(1) practicing as an expert clinician in the


provision of direct nursing care to a selected


population of patients or clients in any setting,


including private practice,


(2) managing the care of patients or clients with


complex nursing problems,


(3) enhancing patient or client care by integrating


the competencies of clinical practice, education,


consultation, and research, and


(4) referring patients or clients to other services.


c. A Clinical Nurse Specialist in accordance with the


scope of practice of such Clinical Nurse Specialist


shall be eligible to obtain recognition as authorized


by the Board to prescribe, as defined by the rules

Req. No. 87 Page 27


promulgated by the Board pursuant to this section, and


subject to the medical direction of a supervising


physician Section 567.4a of this title and Section 1


of this act. This authorization shall not include


dispensing drugs, but shall not preclude, subject to


federal regulations, the receipt of, the signing for,


or the dispensing of professional samples to patients.


d. The Clinical Nurse Specialist accepts responsibility,


accountability, and obligation to practice in


accordance with usual and customary advanced practice


nursing standards and functions as defined by the


scope of practice/role definition statements for the


Clinical Nurse Specialist;


8. “Nurse-Midwife” is “Certified Nurse-Midwife” means a nurse


who has received an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse license from


the Oklahoma Board of Nursing who possesses evidence of


certification according to the requirements of the American College


of Nurse-Midwives.


A Certified Nurse-Midwife in accordance with the scope of


practice of such Certified Nurse-Midwife shall be eligible to obtain


recognition as authorized by the Board to prescribe, as defined by


the rules promulgated by the Board pursuant to this section and


subject to the medical direction of a supervising physician Section


567.4a of this title and Section 1 of this act. This authorization

Req. No. 87 Page 28


shall not include the dispensing of drugs, but shall not preclude,


subject to federal regulations, the receipt of, the signing for, or


the dispensing of professional samples to patients.


The Certified Nurse-Midwife accepts responsibility,


accountability, and obligation to practice in accordance with usual


and customary advanced practice registered nursing standards and


functions as defined by the scope of practice/role definition


statements for the Certified Nurse-Midwife;


9. “Nurse-midwifery practice” means providing management of


care of normal newborns and women, antepartally, intrapartally,


postpartally, and gynecologically, occurring within a health care


system which provides for medical consultation, medical management,


or referral, and is in accord with the standards for nurse-midwifery


practice as defined by the American College of Nurse-Midwives;


10. a. “Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist” is means an


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse who:


(1) is certified by the National Board of


Certification and Recertification for Nurse


Anesthetists as a Certified Registered Nurse


Anesthetist within one (1) year following


completion of an approved certified registered


nurse anesthetist Certified Registered Nurse


Anesthetist education program, and continues to


maintain such recertification by the National

Req. No. 87 Page 29


Board of Certification and Recertification for


Nurse Anesthetists, and


(2) administers anesthesia in collaboration with a


medical doctor, an osteopathic physician, a


podiatric physician, or a dentist licensed in


this state and under conditions in which timely


onsite on-site consultation by such doctor,


osteopath, podiatric physician, or dentist is


available.


b. A Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist, in


collaboration with a medical doctor, osteopathic


physician, podiatric physician, or dentist licensed in


this state, and under conditions in which timely, on-


site consultation by such medical doctor, osteopathic


physician, podiatric physician, or dentist is


available, shall be authorized, pursuant to rules


adopted by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing, to order,


select, obtain, and administer legend drugs, Schedules


II through V controlled substances, devices, and


medical gases only when engaged in the preanesthetic


preparation and evaluation; anesthesia induction,


maintenance, and emergence; and postanesthesia care.


A Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist may order,



Req. No. 87 Page 30


select, obtain, and administer drugs only during the


perioperative or periobstetrical period.


c. A Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist who applies


for authorization to order, select, obtain, and


administer drugs shall:


(1) be currently recognized as a Certified Registered


Nurse Anesthetist in this state,


(2) provide evidence of completion, within the two-


year period immediately preceding the date of


application, of a minimum of fifteen (15) units


of continuing education in advanced pharmacology


related to the administration of anesthesia as


recognized by the National Board of Certification


and Recertification for Nurse Anesthetists, and


(3) complete and submit a notarized application, on a


form prescribed by the Board, accompanied by the


application fee established pursuant to this


section.


d. The authority to order, select, obtain, and administer


drugs shall be terminated if a Certified Registered


Nurse Anesthetist has:


(1) ordered, selected, obtained, or administered


drugs outside of the Certified Registered Nurse


Anesthetist scope of practice or ordered,

Req. No. 87 Page 31


selected, obtained, or administered drugs for


other than therapeutic purposes, or


(2) violated any provision of state laws or rules or


federal laws or regulations pertaining to the


practice of nursing or the authority to order,


select, obtain, and administer drugs.


e. The Oklahoma Board of Nursing shall notify the State


Board of Pharmacy after termination of or a change in


the authority to order, select, obtain, and administer


drugs for a Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist.


f. The Board shall provide by rule for biennial


application renewal and reauthorization of authority


to order, select, obtain, and administer drugs for


Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetists. At the time


of application renewal, a Certified Registered Nurse


Anesthetist shall submit documentation of a minimum of


eight (8) units of continuing education, completed


during the previous two (2) years, in advanced


pharmacology relating to the administration of


anesthesia, as recognized by the Council on


Recertification of Nurse Anesthetists or the Council


on Certification of Nurse Anesthetists National Board


of Certification and Recertification for Nurse


Anesthetists.

Req. No. 87 Page 32


g. This paragraph shall not prohibit the administration


of local or topical anesthetics as now permitted by


law. Provided further, nothing in this paragraph


shall limit the authority of the Board of Dentistry to


establish the qualifications for dentists who direct


the administration of anesthesia.


h. As used in this paragraph, “collaboration” means an


agreement between a medical doctor, osteopathic


physician, podiatric physician, or dentist performing


the procedure or directly involved with the procedure


and the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist working


jointly toward a common goal providing services for


the same patient. This collaboration involves the


joint formulation, discussion, and agreement of the


anesthesia plan by both parties, and the collaborating


medical doctor, osteopathic physician, podiatric


physician, or dentist performing the procedure or


directly involved with the procedure and that


collaborating physician shall remain available for


timely onsite on-site consultation during the delivery


of anesthesia for diagnosis, consultation, and


treatment of medical conditions;


11. “Supervising physician” means an individual holding a


current license to practice as a physician from the State Board of

Req. No. 87 Page 33


Medical Licensure and Supervision or the State Board of Osteopathic


Examiners, who supervises a Certified Nurse Practitioner, a Clinical


Nurse Specialist, or a Certified Nurse-Midwife who has not obtained


independent prescriptive authority under Section 1 of this act, and


who is not in training as an intern, resident, or fellow. To be


eligible to supervise such Advanced Practice Registered Nurse, such


The supervising physician shall remain in compliance with the rules


promulgated by the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision


or the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners;


12. “Supervision of an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse with


prescriptive authority” means overseeing and accepting


responsibility for the ordering and transmission by assuring


availability of the supervising physician to a Certified Nurse


Practitioner, a Clinical Nurse Specialist, or a Certified Nurse-


Midwife of who has not obtained independent prescriptive authority


under Section 1 of this act through direct contact,


telecommunications, or other appropriate electronic means for


consultation, assistance with medical emergencies, or patient


referral with respect to written, telephonic, electronic, or oral


prescriptions for drugs and other medical supplies, subject to a


defined formulary; and


13. “Advanced Unlicensed Assistant” means any person who has


successfully completed a certified training program approved by the


Board that trains the Advanced Unlicensed Assistant to perform

Req. No. 87 Page 34


specified technical skills identified by the Board in acute care


settings under the direction and supervision of the Registered Nurse


or Licensed Practical Nurse.


SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 567.4a, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 567.4a. The Oklahoma Board of Nursing may grant


prescriptive authority through the Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse license to Certified Nurse Practitioners, Clinical Nurse


Specialists, and Certified Nurse-Midwives who meet the requirements


for prescriptive authority identified by law and in the Board’s


rules. The rules regarding prescriptive authority recognition


promulgated by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing pursuant to paragraphs


through 9, 11 and 12 of this section, Section 567.3a of this


title, and Section 1 of this act shall:


1. Define the procedure for documenting supervision by a


supervising physician licensed in Oklahoma to practice by the State


Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision or the State Board of


Osteopathic Examiners, as defined in Section 567.3a of this title,


of a Certified Nurse Practitioner, Clinical Nurse Specialist, or


Certified Nurse-Midwife who has not obtained independent


prescriptive authority under Section 1 of this act. Such procedure


shall include a written statement that defines appropriate referral,


consultation, and collaboration between the Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse, recognized to prescribe as defined in paragraphs 6

Req. No. 87 Page 35


through 9, 11 and 12 of Section 567.3a of this title, and the


supervising physician. The written statement shall include a method


of assuring availability of the supervising physician through direct


contact, telecommunications, or other appropriate electronic means


for consultation, assistance with medical emergencies, or patient


referral. The written statement shall be part of the initial


application and the renewal application submitted to the Board for


recognition for prescriptive authority for the Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse. Changes to the written statement shall be filed


with the Board within thirty (30) days of the change and shall be


effective on filing;


2. Define the procedure for documenting independent


prescriptive authority for Certified Nurse Practitioners, Clinical


Nurse Specialists, and Certified Nurse-Midwives who have obtained


independent prescriptive authority under Section 1 of this act;


3. Define minimal requirements for initial application for


prescriptive authority which shall include, but not be limited to,


evidence of completion of a minimum of forty-five (45) contact hours


or three (3) academic credit hours of education in


pharmacotherapeutics, clinical application, and use of


pharmacological agents in the prevention of illness, and in the


restoration and maintenance of health in a program beyond basic


registered nurse preparation, approved by the Board. Such contact


hours or academic credits shall be obtained within a time period of

Req. No. 87 Page 36


three (3) years immediately preceding the date of application for


prescriptive authority;


3. 4. Define minimal requirements for application for renewal


of prescriptive authority which shall include, but not be limited


to, documentation of a minimum of:


a. fifteen (15) contact hours or one (1) academic credit


hour of education in pharmacotherapeutics, clinical


application, and use of pharmacological agents in the


prevention of illness, and in the restoration and


maintenance of health in a program beyond basic


registered nurse preparation, and


b. two (2) hours of education in pain management or two


(2) hours of education in opioid use or addiction,


unless the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse has


demonstrated to the satisfaction of the Board that the


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse does not currently


hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration


registration number,


approved by the Board, within the two-year period immediately


preceding the effective date of application for renewal of


prescriptive authority;


4. 5. Require that beginning July 1, 2002, an Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse shall demonstrate demonstrates successful


completion of a master’s degree or higher in a clinical nurse

Req. No. 87 Page 37


specialty one of the following Advanced Practice Registered Nurse


roles:


a. Certified Nurse Practitioner,


b. Clinical Nurse Specialist, or


c. Certified Nurse-Midwife,


in order to be eligible for initial application for prescriptive


authority under the provisions of the Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act;


5. 6. Define the method for communicating authority to


prescribe or termination of same, and the formulary to the State


Board of Pharmacy, all pharmacies, and all registered pharmacists;


6. 7. Define terminology used in such rules;


7. 8. Define the parameters for the prescribing practices of


the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse;


8. 9. Define the methods for termination of prescriptive


authority for the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse; and


9. 10. a. Establish a Formulary Advisory Council that


shall develop and submit to the Board recommendations


for an exclusionary formulary that shall list drugs or


categories of drugs that shall not be prescribed by an


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse recognized to


prescribe by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing. The


Formulary Advisory Council shall also develop and


submit to the Board recommendations for practice-


specific prescriptive standards for each category of

Req. No. 87 Page 38


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse recognized to


prescribe by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing pursuant to


the provisions of the Oklahoma Nursing Practice Act.


The Board shall either accept or reject the


recommendations made by the Council. No amendments to


the recommended exclusionary formulary may be made by


the Board without the approval of the Formulary


Advisory Council.


b. In addition to the other powers and duties of the


Formulary Advisory Council prescribed by this


paragraph, the Formulary Advisory Council shall


develop guidelines for supervising physicians on best


practices for the supervision of Advanced Practice


Registered Nurses who have not obtained independent


prescriptive authority. The supervision guidelines


shall be published on the Board’s website and the


Formulary Advisory Council shall periodically update


the guidelines as necessary.


c. The Formulary Advisory Council shall be composed of


twelve (12) members as follows:


(1) four members, to include a pediatrician, an


obstetrician-gynecological physician, a general


internist, and a family practice physician;


provided, that three of such members shall be

Req. No. 87 Page 39


appointed by the Oklahoma State Medical


Association, and one shall be appointed by the


Oklahoma Osteopathic Association,


(2) four members who are registered pharmacists,


appointed by the Oklahoma Pharmaceutical


Pharmacists Association, and


(3) four members, one of whom shall be a Certified


Nurse Practitioner, one of whom shall be a


Clinical Nurse Specialist, one of whom shall be a


Certified Nurse-Midwife, and one of whom shall be


a current member of the Oklahoma Board of


Nursing, all of whom shall be appointed by the


Oklahoma Board of Nursing.


c. d. All professional members of the Formulary Advisory


Council shall be in active clinical practice, at least


fifty percent (50%) of the time, within their defined


area of specialty. The members of the Formulary


Advisory Council shall serve at the pleasure of the


appointing authority for a term of three (3) years.


The terms of the members shall be staggered. Members


of the Council may serve beyond the expiration of


their term of office until a successor is appointed by


the original appointing authority. A vacancy on the



Req. No. 87 Page 40


Council shall be filled for the balance of the


unexpired term by the original appointing authority.


d. e. Members of the Council shall elect a chair and a


vice-chair vice chair from among the membership of the


Council. For the transaction of business, at least


seven members, with a minimum of two members present


from each of the identified categories of physicians,


pharmacists, and advanced practice registered nurses


Advanced Practice Registered Nurses, shall constitute


a quorum. The Council shall recommend and the Board


shall approve and implement an initial exclusionary


formulary on or before January 1, 1997. The Council


and the Board shall annually review the approved


exclusionary formulary and shall make any necessary


revisions utilizing the same procedures used to


develop the initial exclusionary formulary.


SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 567.5a, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 94, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 567.5a), is amended to read as follows:


Section 567.5a. A. All applicants for a license to practice as


an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse shall be subject to Section


567.8 of this title.


B. An applicant for an initial license to practice as an


Advanced Practice Registered Nurse shall:

Req. No. 87 Page 41


1. Submit a completed written application and appropriate fees


as established by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing;


2. Submit a criminal history records check that complies with


Section 567.18 of this title;


3. Hold a current Registered Nurse license in this state;


4. Have completed an advanced practice registered nursing


education program in one of the four advanced practice registered


nurse Advanced Practice Registered Nurse roles and a specialty area


recognized by the Board. Effective January 1, 2016, the applicant


shall have completed an accredited graduate level advanced practice


registered nursing education program in at least one of the


following population foci: family/individual across the lifespan,


adult-gerontology, neonatal, pediatrics, women’s health/gender-


related, or psychiatric/mental health;


5. Be currently certified in an advanced practice specialty


certification consistent with educational preparation and by a


national certifying body recognized by the Board; and


6. Provide any and all other evidence as required by the Board


in its rules.


C. The Board may issue a license by endorsement to an Advanced


Practice Registered Nurse licensed under the laws of another state


if the applicant meets the qualifications for licensure in this


state. An applicant by endorsement shall:



Req. No. 87 Page 42


1. Submit a completed written application and appropriate fees


as established by the Board;


2. Submit a criminal history records check that complies with


Section 567.18 of this title;


3. Hold a current Registered Nurse license in this state;


4. Hold recognition as an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse in


a state or territory;


5. Have completed an advanced practice registered nursing


education program in one of the four roles and a specialty area


recognized by the Board. Effective January 1, 2016, the applicant


shall have completed an accredited graduate level advanced practice


registered nursing education program in at least one of the


following population foci: family/individual across the lifespan,


adult-gerontology, neonatal, pediatrics, women’s health/gender-


related, or psychiatric/mental health;


6. Be currently certified in an advanced practice specialty


certification consistent with educational preparation and by a


national certifying body recognized by the Board;


7. Meet continued competency requirements as set forth in Board


rules; and


8. Provide any and all other evidence as required by the Board


in its rules.


D. The Board may issue prescriptive authority recognition by


endorsement to an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse licensed as an

Req. No. 87 Page 43


APRN-CNP Advanced Practice Registered Nurse-Certified Nurse


Practitioner (APRN-CNP), APRN-CNS Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse-Clinical Nurse Specialist (APRN-CNS), or APRN-CNM Advanced


Practice Registered Nurse-Certified Nurse-Midwife (APRN-CNM) under


the laws of another state if the applicant meets the requirements


set forth in this section. An applicant for prescriptive authority


recognition by endorsement shall:


1. Submit a completed written application and appropriate fees


as established by the Board;


2. Hold current Registered Nurse and Advanced Practice


Registered Nurse licenses (APRN-CNP, APRN-CNS, or APRN-CNM) in the


state;


3. Hold current licensure or recognition as an Advanced


Practice Registered Nurse in the same role and specialty with


prescribing privileges in another state or territory;


4. Submit documentation verifying successful completion of a


graduate level graduate-level advanced practice registered nursing


education program that included an academic course in


pharmacotherapeutic management, and didactic and clinical


preparation for prescribing incorporated throughout the program;


5. Submit a written statement from an Oklahoma licensed


physician supervising prescriptive authority as required by the


Board in its rules, or submit documentation that the applicant meets



Req. No. 87 Page 44


the requirements for independent prescriptive authority under


Section 1 of this act;


6. Meet continued competency requirements as set forth in Board


rules; and


7. Provide any and all other evidence as required by the Board


in its rules.


E. An Advanced Practice Registered Nurse license issued under


this section shall be renewed concurrently with the registered nurse


Registered Nurse license, provided that qualifying criteria continue


to be met.


F. The Board may reinstate a license as set forth in Board


rules.


SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-312, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 184, O.S.L. 2022 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2-312), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-312. A. A physician, podiatrist, optometrist, or a


dentist who has complied with the registration requirements of the


Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, in good faith and in


the course of such person’s professional practice only, may


prescribe and administer controlled dangerous substances, or may


cause the same to be administered by medical or paramedical


personnel acting under the direction and supervision of the


physician, podiatrist, optometrist, or dentist, and only may



Req. No. 87 Page 45


dispense controlled dangerous substances pursuant to the provisions


of Sections 355.1 and 355.2 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. A veterinarian who has complied with the registration


requirements of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, in


good faith and in the course of the professional practice of the


veterinarian only, and not for use by a human being, may prescribe,


administer, and dispense controlled dangerous substances and may


cause them to be administered by an assistant or orderly under the


direction and supervision of the veterinarian.


C. 1. An advanced practice nurse Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse who is recognized to prescribe by the Oklahoma Board of


Nursing as an advanced registered nurse practitioner, clinical nurse


specialist or certified nurse-midwife, a Certified Nurse


Practitioner, Clinical Nurse Specialist, or Certified Nurse-Midwife


but who has not obtained independent prescriptive authority under


Section 1 of this act and therefore is subject to medical direction


by a current supervision agreement with a supervising physician,


pursuant to Section 567.3a of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and


who has complied with the registration requirements of the Uniform


Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, in good faith and in the course


of professional practice only, may prescribe and administer Schedule


III, IV, and V controlled dangerous substances.


2. An Advanced Practice Registered Nurse who is recognized to


prescribe by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing as a Certified Nurse

Req. No. 87 Page 46


Practitioner, Clinical Nurse Specialist, or Certified Nurse-Midwife


who has obtained independent prescriptive authority under Section 1


of this act, and who has complied with the registration requirements


of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, in good faith


and in the course of professional practice only, may prescribe and


administer Schedule III, IV, and V controlled dangerous substances.


D. An advanced practice nurse Advanced Practice Registered


Nurse who is recognized to order, select, obtain, and administer


drugs by the Oklahoma Board of Nursing as a certified registered


nurse anesthetist Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist pursuant to


Section 353.1b of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes and who has


complied with the registration requirements of the Uniform


Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, in good faith and in the course


of such practitioner’s professional practice only, may order,


select, obtain, and administer Schedules II through V controlled


dangerous substances in a preanesthetic preparation or evaluation;


anesthesia induction, maintenance, or emergence; or postanesthesia


care setting only. A certified registered nurse anesthetist


Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist may order, select, obtain,


and administer such drugs only during the perioperative or


periobstetrical period.


E. A physician assistant who is recognized to prescribe by the


State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision under the medical


direction of a supervising physician, pursuant to Section 519.6 of

Req. No. 87 Page 47


Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and who has complied with the


registration requirements of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous


Substances Act, in good faith and in the course of professional


practice only, may prescribe and administer Schedule II through V


controlled dangerous substances.


SECTION 11. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-87 DC 1/19/2025 5:38:54 AM

































Req. No. 87 Page 48